Washington statutes.
RCW 19.120.110

Civil actions by retailers—Attorneys' fees.

Any motor fuel retailer who is injured in his or her business by the commission of any act prohibited by this chapter, or any motor fuel retailer injured because of his or her refusal to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consumated, would be in violation of this chapter may bring a civil action in superior court to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or both, together with the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees.

[ 1986 c 320 s 12.]